Hawaii statutes.
[§457-17] Telehealth; privacy, security,
and confidentiality. [Section effective January 1, 2017.] Services
relating to the practice of nursing provided by telehealth pursuant to this
chapter shall be consistent with all federal and state privacy, security, and
confidentiality laws. [L 2016, c 226, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next